ru: Форма щетки: Комбинированная; Цилиндрическая; Овальная; Прямоугольная; Круглая; Другая
th: รูปทรงแปรง: แบบผสม; ทรงกระบอก; วงรี; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; อื่นๆ
en: Brush shape: Combination; Cylindrical; Oval; Rectangular; Round; Other
hr-HR: Oblik četke: Kombinirani; Cilindrični; Ovalni; Pravokutni; Okrugli; Ostalo
sv: Borstform: Kombination; Cylindrisk; Oval; Rektangulär; Rund; Övrigt
sk-SK: Tvar kefy: Kombinovaná; Valcovitá; Oválna; Obdĺžniková; Okrúhla; Iné
tr: Fırça şekli: Kombinasyon; Silindirik; Oval; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Diğer
fr: Forme du pinceau: Combinaison; Cylindrique; Ovale; Rectangulaire; Ronde; Autre
sl-SI: Oblika krtače: Kombinacija; Valjasto; Ovalno; Pravokotno; Okroglo; Drugo
pt-BR: Forma da escova: Combinado; Cilíndrico; Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Outros
es: Forma del cepillo: Combinación; Cilíndrica; Ovalada; Rectangular; Redonda; Otra
zh-CN: 雪板刷造型: 组合形; 圆柱形; 椭圆形; 长方形; 圆形; 其他
nl: Borstel vorm: Combinatie; Cilindrisch; Ovaal; Rechthoekig; Rond; Overig
it: Shapes: Combinazione; Cilindrica; Ovale; Rettangolare; Rotonda; Altro
lt-LT: Šepetėlio forma: Kombinuotas; Cilindrinis; Ovalus; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Kitas
fi: Harjan muoto: Yhdistelmä; Sylinterimäinen; Ovaali; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Muu
pt-PT: Forma da escova: Combinação; Cilíndrico; Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Outro
vi: Hình dạng bàn chải: Kết hợp; Hình trụ; Hình bầu dục; Hình chữ nhật; Tròn; Khác
zh-TW: 刷子形狀: 組合; 圓柱形; 橢圓形; 長方形; 圓形; 其他
bg-BG: Форма на четката: Комбинирана; Цилиндрична; Овална; Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Друго
nb: Børsteform: Kombinasjon; Sylindrisk; Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Annet
de: Bürstenform: Kombination; Zylindrisch; Oval; Rechteckig; Rund; Sonstiges
pl: Kształt pędzla: Mieszany; Cylindryczny; Owalny; Prostokątny; Okrągły; Inny
hu: Kefe alakja: Kombinált; Henger alakú; Ovális; Téglalap alakú; Kerek; Egyéb
ko: 브러시 모양: 콤비네이션; 원통형; 타원형; 직사각형; 원형; 기타
el: Σχήμα πινέλου: Συνδυαστική; Κυλινδρική; Οβάλ; Ορθογώνια; Στρογγυλή; Άλλη
cs: Tvar štětce: Kombinovaný; Válcovitý; Oválný; Obdélníkový; Kulatý; Jiné
da: Børsteform: Kombination; Cylindrisk; Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Andet
ja: ブラシのShapes: コンビネーション; 円筒形; 楕円形; 長方形; 丸型; その他
ro-RO: Formă perie: Combinație; Cilindric; Oval; Dreptunghiular; Rotund; Altele